Illinois, session 104th, HB1912.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as Jaedyn's Law. 6    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 7by adding Section 5.36 as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 505/5.36 new)9    Sec. 5.36. Independent living; permanent living 10arrangement requirement. The Department shall adopt a rule 11that requires a youth in care who is under the age of 18 to 12demonstrate, as prescribed by the Department, that the youth 13has a stable and permanent living arrangement in place prior 14to and as a condition of eligibility for independent living 15and related services. The rule shall be implemented no later 16than January 1, 2026 and shall be in addition to any other 17eligibility requirements for independent living and related 18services. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.